Massachusetts, session 194th, H4811.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by striking out section 45A and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 45A. (a) An applicant for limited registration under this section who is 18 years 
of age or over and of good moral character who shall furnish the board with satisfactory proof 
that they have received a diploma from the faculty of a reputable dental college as defined in 
section 46 and who shall furnish the board with satisfactory proof that they have been employed 
as a member of the faculty of a dental college accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of 
Dental and Dental Auxiliary Educational Programs of the American Dental Association or that 
they have been appointed a dental intern in a hospital or other institution maintained by the 
commonwealth or by a county or municipality thereof, or in a hospital or dental infirmary 
incorporated under the laws of the commonwealth, may upon payment of a fee to be determined 
annually by the commissioner of administration under the provision of section 3B of chapter 7 be 
registered by the board as a limited registrant for one year; provided, however, that practice 
under any such original or renewal limited registration so issued by the board shall be limited to 

of 2 15 no longer than 5 years unless said applicant passes a clinical examination administered by the 
board or is a full time faculty member.  
(b) A limited registration shall entitle an applicant to practice dentistry only in the 
hospital or other institution designated on their registration and under the direction of a registered 
dentist therein; provided, however, that a full-time faculty member may participate in, and only 
in, an intramural group dental practice which is operated, managed and physically located within 
a nonprofit dental educational or research institution and their affiliated hospitals in which the 
full time faculty member is employed. Limited registration or special limited registration under 
this section may be revoked at any time by the board and a holder of such a limited registration 
shall not practice dentistry in a private dental office or private dental clinic except as provided in 
subsection (c). 
(c) Upon the completion of 5 years of practice under any original or renewal license 
authorized by subsection (a), an applicant may apply to the board for a special limited 
registration which shall entitle an applicant to practice dentistry in any private dental practice 
where MassHealth, as defined in section 9A of chapter 118E, is accepted under the supervision 
of a registered dentist therein such practice.